Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 7 REGIONAL SERVICE AUTHORITIES
32-7-133. Formation of special taxing districts.

Special taxing districts may be established pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The board may by resolution propose the formation of the district, which resolution shall designate the proposed boundaries thereof, specify the proposed service, and set forth the methods of financing proposed for the district.

The board shall present the proposal for public hearing to be held within sixty days after introduction of the resolution with notice to be published not less than fifteen days before the date set for hearing.

At the hearing any eligible elector within the service authority may be heard on the proposal, including questions of inclusion in or exclusion from the district, and all objections shall be determined by the board on the basis of the public interest, taking into consideration the needs of the service authority and the availability of the service to the territory which is the subject of any objection.

The board may continue the hearing as necessary and may, after the conclusion thereof, enact the proposed resolution, with or without amendments, or may reject the proposed resolution.

Decisions of the board concerning the formation of a special taxing district are not subject to review unless action is instituted by a registered elector to review such proceedings within forty-five days after passage of the resolution, and any such review shall extend only to the question of whether the board exceeded its jurisdiction or abused its discretion. If the court so finds, it shall remand the matter to the board for further proceedings, consistent with such findings.

No restraining order or temporary injunction enjoining the formation, the inclusion or exclusion of territory, or the operation of the special taxing district may be issued pending final judgment of the district court. Any such final judgment which has the effect of enjoining the formation, the inclusion or exclusion of territory, or the operation of a special taxing district shall automatically be stayed upon the filing of any appeal of such decision, and no application for supersedeas shall be necessary. Such stay shall continue in full force and effect pending final disposition of the proceedings.

Changes in the boundaries or major changes in services or financing of a special taxing district may be initiated by resolution of the board or by petition signed by five percent of the eligible electors of the district, and these proposals shall be considered in the same manner as provided in this section for proposals for the original formation of a district.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 474, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-33.

L. 85:

(4), (6), and (8) amended, p. 1355, § 33, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(2) to (4) and (8) amended, p. 904, § 151, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-134. Local improvement districts authorized.

The board of a service authority may establish local improvement districts within the service authority to facilitate the financing and construction or improvement of facilities within a portion or portions of a service authority. Such local improvement districts shall be established whenever any area, in the opinion of the board, will be especially benefited by the construction, installation, or improvement of any facilities.

Such improvements shall be of a type to confer special benefits to real property within the boundaries of any such local improvement district and general benefits to the service authority at large or to a special taxing district within the service authority.

In the management of a local improvement district, the board of the service authority shall have all powers granted to the board by this article.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 474, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-34.

32-7-135. Procedures to establish local improvement districts.

Local improvement districts may be established pursuant to the provisions of this section.

The board of a service authority may establish local improvement districts within the boundaries of the service authority either by:

Resolution of the board, subject to protest by the owners of a majority of all property benefited and constituting the basis of assessment as the board may determine; or

Petition by the owners of a majority of all property benefited and constituting the basis of assessment in the proposed district.

In either event, a public hearing shall be held at which all interested parties may appear and be heard. Right to protest and notice of public hearing shall be given as provided by the resolution of the board.

The board has the power by resolution to prescribe the method of making such improvements, of assessing the cost thereof, and of issuing bonds for cost of constructing or installing such improvements, including the costs incidental thereto.

Decisions of the board concerning the formation of a local improvement district are not subject to review unless action is instituted by an eligible elector of the service authority or owner of property within the local improvement district within forty-five days after passage of the resolution to form the improvement district, and any review shall extend only to the question of whether the board exceeded its jurisdiction or abused its discretion. If a court so finds, it shall remand the matter to the board for further proceedings, consistent with such findings.

Where all outstanding bonds of a local improvement district have been paid and any moneys remain to the credit of such district, they shall be transferred to a special surplus and deficiency fund, and whenever there is a deficiency in any local improvement district fund to meet the payments of outstanding bonds and interest due thereon, the deficiency shall be paid out of said surplus and deficiency fund.

Whenever a local improvement district has paid and canceled three-fourths of its bonds issued, and for any reason the remaining assessments are not paid in time to retire the remaining bonds of the district and the interest due thereon, and there are not sufficient moneys in the special surplus and deficiency fund, then the service authority shall pay said bonds when due and the interest due thereon and reimburse itself by collecting the unpaid assessments due said local improvement district.

In consideration of general benefits conferred on the service authority at large or on a special taxing district within the service authority, as the case may be, by the construction or installation of improvements in a local improvement district, the board may levy annual taxes on all taxable property within the service authority or within the special taxing district, as the case may be, at a rate not exceeding four mills in any one year, to be disbursed as determined by the board for the purpose of paying for such general benefits, for the payment of any assessment levied against the service authority or special taxing district, as the case may be, in connection with bonds issued for local improvement districts, or for the purpose of advancing moneys to maintain current payments of interest and equal annual payments of the principal amount of bonds issued for any local improvement district.

The proceeds of such taxes shall be placed in a special fund and shall be disbursed only for the purposes specified; except that, in lieu of such tax levies, the board may annually transfer to such special fund any available moneys of the service authority or of the special taxing district, as the case may be, but in no event shall the amount transferred in any one year exceed the amount which would result from a tax levied in such year as limited in this section.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 475, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-35.

L. 85:

(5) amended, p. 1355, § 34, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(5) amended, p. 904, § 152, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-136. Special districts - transfer of responsibility.

The governing body of any special district organized pursuant to part 2 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., or article 1 or part 4 of article 4 of this title may designate the board of directors of the service authority in which the district is located to act as the board of directors of said district in the manner and within the limitations set forth in this section, if said service authority is authorized to perform the same service or services as the district is performing. Such designation may be made notwithstanding any other provision of this title (except article 8), article 8 of title 29, part 2 of article 20 of title 30, and parts 5 and 6 of article 25 of title 31, C.R.S.

The designation shall be made by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the governing board of the district. Prior to the adoption of the resolution, the district governing board shall hold a public hearing on the proposed designation giving all parties who are eligible electors of the district an opportunity to be heard with regard to the proposal. Notice by publication of the hearing shall be given.

Certified copies of any resolution approving said designation, if adopted, shall be filed, not later than thirty days after adoption, with the regional service authority board, the county clerk and recorder of each county within which the district is located, the clerk of the district court by order of which said district was organized, and the division of local government.

Said resolution shall be effective upon completion of said filings, and said designation shall take effect upon the date set forth in said resolution, or, if none, then on the first day of the second calendar month following the effective date of said resolution, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

If the lesser of forty percent or two hundred of the eligible electors of the district request, by a petition filed with the district governing board not more than twenty days after adoption of the resolution, that the question of approving the designation be submitted to a vote of the eligible electors of the district at the next regular election or at a special election called for that purpose, the resolution and designation shall not take effect unless and until approved at the election. The question shall be so submitted by the district governing board at the next regular election, if held not more than one hundred twenty days nor less than sixty days after the filing of the petition. If no regular election is to be held within that period, the question shall be so submitted at a special election called for that purpose to be held within ninety days after the filing of the petition.

If approved by a majority of those eligible electors of the district voting thereon, the resolution shall be filed as required by subsection (3) of this section, and the designation shall become effective on the date set forth in the resolution or, if none, on the first day of the second calendar month following the effective date of the resolution.

If at least forty percent or two hundred of the eligible electors of the district, whichever is the lesser number, request, by a petition filed with the district governing board, that the board adopt a resolution to designate the regional service authority to be and act as the board of directors, the district governing board shall, within sixty days, hold a hearing as provided in this section. The board shall, within thirty days after the hearing, adopt a resolution and make such designation or shall act to submit the question of approving the designation at a special election called for that purpose to be held within ninety days after the filing of the petition.

Any resolution adopted by the board calling for a special election shall name a designated election official who shall be responsible for the conducting of the election. The election shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 476, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-36.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1625, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2) and (5) to (7) amended, p. 1355, § 35, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(2) and (5) to (7) amended and (8) added, p. 905, § 153, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-137. Special districts - formation within service authority territory forbidden.

Once a service authority is established in any given area, no new special districts may be organized pursuant to part 2 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., or article 1 or part 4 of article 4 of this title within the territory or any portion thereof of said service authority if the service authority is authorized to provide the same or essentially the same service or services as the special district would be authorized to perform.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 477, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-37.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1625, § 29, effective July 1.

32-7-138. Transfer and assumption of services.

Unless another date is provided in this article or the proposition for assumption of a service by a service authority or agreed to by the board and any local governmental unit from which the service is to be transferred, those services being assumed and those rights, properties, and other assets and liabilities of said local governmental unit incident to the service transferred and assumed shall be transferred to and assumed by the service authority on the second January 1 after authorization of the transfer of said service.

Where a local governmental unit providing part or all of the service being transferred to and assumed by the service authority is located partly within and partly without the service authority, the board, after notice by publication and hearing, shall determine which of the rights, properties, and other assets and liabilities shall be transferred to and assumed by the service authority. The board's determination shall be based on a fair and equitable allocation of rights, properties, and other assets and liabilities. Adequate provision shall be made for payment of outstanding indebtedness as it becomes due, and no such transfer and assumption shall deprive residents of a local governmental unit of any existing services necessary for their health, welfare, and safety.

The plan of distribution provided for in subsection (2) of this section shall be final and conclusive against all persons unless an action is brought by the local governmental unit from which such rights, properties, and other assets and liabilities are to be transferred in the district court having jurisdiction over formation of the service authority within thirty days after adoption of said plan. All proceedings pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and heard at the earliest practical moment. No such plan shall be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding, except as expressly authorized in this subsection (3).

Where a service is to be provided by the service authority by contract with one or more other local governmental units, any transfer to and assumption by the service authority of any rights, properties, and other assets and liabilities shall be to the extent and as provided by contract between the board and the other local governmental unit or units.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 477, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-38.

32-7-139. Payments for facilities acquired by regional service authority - valuation.

For any service authorized and approved under this article, the board of directors may acquire rights, properties, and other assets and liabilities of counties, municipalities, or special districts either through contract with the local governmental unit or upon resolution of the board, pursuant to section 32-1-701 (4), or upon the provision of any service on an exclusive basis as provided in section 32-7-112. Upon assuming the rights, title, and interest in any facility, the board shall become obligated to pay to the county, municipality, or special district, as the case may be, an amount, when due, equivalent to that necessary for the payment of all outstanding bonds and obligations of said jurisdictions for the acquisition, construction, and improvement of facilities acquired by the board.

Upon the acquisition of facilities as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall provide an offset of charges to the local jurisdiction either in service fees or ad valorem taxes in an amount equivalent to that which must be raised by the local governmental unit for the payment of outstanding obligations owed by such jurisdiction upon facilities acquired by the board.

When any service authority board assumes the ownership of any existing facilities of a local governmental unit, the local governmental unit which paid part or all of the cost of such facilities, directly or by contract with another entity, may be entitled to receive a credit against any service charges or ad valorem taxes which may be apportioned or charged to the residents of such local governmental unit. Said credit may be spread over a period not exceeding thirty years. An additional credit equal to interest on the unused credit balance may be paid annually at a rate not exceeding four percent per annum. The amount of such credit shall not exceed the current value of the facilities. The board shall negotiate with the local governmental units in determining the value of any facility and the amount of credit to be granted, but the determination of the board shall be final subject to court review.

In the event a local governmental unit believes that the board has been arbitrary or capricious in providing or not providing for a credit as permitted in this section, the governing board of such jurisdiction may commence an action in the district court. The court may dismiss the action or recommit the controversy to the board for further negotiation, if it determines that the action of the board was arbitrary or capricious.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 478, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-39.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1625, § 30, effective July 1.

32-7-140. Public transportation.

For the purpose of providing public surface transportation, a service authority shall have, insofar as consistent with this article, any additional special powers applicable to the provision of that specific service as provided by article 9 of this title. The mill levy limitation for ad valorem taxes imposed by said article 9 shall be applicable to the service of public surface transportation when such service is provided by a service authority. Any municipality may plan or operate a public surface transportation system, and any county or municipality may contract with a service authority for the planning or operation of such a system. In addition, any county may plan and operate such a system if such plan is made in coordination with, or is made by, a regional transportation district or a service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 479, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-40.

32-7-141. Sewage collection, treatment, and disposal.

For the purpose of providing sewage collection, treatment, and disposal, a service authority has, insofar as consistent with this article, any additional special powers applicable to the provision of that specific service as provided in part 5 of article 4 of this title. Any municipality as defined therein participating with the service authority shall have the additional powers provided municipalities in part 5 of article 4 of this title.

If the board finds that a sewer line connection is necessary for the protection of the public health, and if the sewer line of the service authority are within four hundred feet of the nearest property line of such premises, the board may compel the owner of any business, dwelling, or other inhabited premises within the service authority to connect such premises, in accordance with the applicable plumbing code, to a sewer line. Notice to compel such connections shall be given to such owner by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to make such connection within twenty days after receipt of such notice, and if such connection has not begun within such period and completed with reasonable diligence by such owner, the board may thereupon make such connection, and the service authority shall, upon completion, have a first and prior lien on the premises for the cost of such connection. Such liens shall be enforced in accordance with the provisions of section 32-7-117.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 479, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-41.

32-7-142. Urban drainage and flood control.

For the purpose of providing urban drainage and flood control, a service authority shall have, insofar as consistent with this article, any additional special powers applicable to the provision of that specific service as provided by article 11 of this title. The mill levy limitation for ad valorem taxes imposed by said article 11 shall be applicable to the service of providing urban drainage and flood control, when such service is provided by a service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 479, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-42.

32-7-143. Assumption of services by a service authority in the Denver metropolitan area.

In accordance with section 17 (3)(e) of article XIV of the state constitution, after formation of a service authority in the metropolitan area composed of at least that area as specified in section 32-7-104 (2)(b), except for any portion thereof excluded pursuant to section 32-7-104 (3), those special powers, services, rights, and properties and any assets and liabilities of the Denver regional council of governments created pursuant to the provisions of section 30-28-105, C.R.S., shall be transferred to and assumed by the service authority on the first January 1 after formation. The urban drainage and flood control district as created pursuant to article 11 of this title and the metropolitan Denver sewage disposal district no. 1 created pursuant to part 5 of article 4 of this title shall, if the services are approved by a majority of the eligible electors voting thereon in each county within the service authority, be transferred to and assumed by the service authority. The transfer shall be completed by the second January 1 after formation unless an earlier date is agreed to by the board and the respective individual entities.

A service authority assuming the services provided for in this section shall be subject to the following limitations upon ad valorem tax levies incurred by the service authority in furnishing the service, unless a specified greater limit is authorized by the eligible electors of the service authority or by further action of the general assembly:

For the performance of the planning function, assumed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a levy of two-tenths mill;

For the performance of the duties of urban drainage and flood control, assumed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a levy of two and one-half mills as provided in section 32-11-217 (1)(d);

For the performance of the duties of the metropolitan Denver sewage disposal district no. 1, assumed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, no mill levy.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 480, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-43.

L. 75:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1297, § 2, effective June 16.

L. 85:

(1)(a) and IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1356, § 36, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and IP(1)(b) amended, p. 906, § 154, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section were renumbered on revision in 1997.

32-7-144. Dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a service authority may be dissolved in a manner pursuant, as nearly as practicable, to the provisions of part 7 of article 1 of this title. Dissolution may be initiated by a petition signed by at least five percent of the eligible electors of the service authority or by a resolution passed by at least three-fourths of the members of the board. No dissolution shall be effected unless approved by a majority of the eligible electors of the service authority voting thereon and unless satisfactory arrangements have been made for the continuation of any services essential for the health, welfare, and safety of residents of the dissolved service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 480, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-44.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1625, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1357, § 37, effective April 30.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 906, § 155, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-145. Early hearings.

All court actions involving the validity of any proceeding under this article which is a matter of immediate public interest and concern shall be advanced and heard at the earliest practical moment.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 480, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-45.

32-7-146. Elections.

Subject to the specific provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, elections shall be conducted as nearly as practicable in the manner provided for general elections.

The regular service authority election in each service authority shall be held on the date determined for general elections.

Any referral of a proposition to allow a service authority to assume exclusive jurisdiction over any service shall be voted upon only on the date determined for general elections.

All necessary expenses of any service authority general election subsequent to the organization of the service authority and other proceedings conducted pursuant to said election shall be paid by the counties within the service authority in proportion to the population of the respective counties within the service authority, and the governing bodies thereof shall enact any necessary supplemental appropriations. When the board calls a special election after formation of the service authority to be held at a time other than the general election, all necessary expenses for the election and other proceedings conducted pursuant to such elections shall be paid by the service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 480, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-46.